Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB209.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6109(e)(1) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 6109. Licenses.* * *(e) Issuance of license.--(1) A license to carry a firearm shall be for the purpose of carrying a firearm concealed on or about one's person or in a vehicle and shall be issued if, after an investigation not to exceed 45 days, it appears that the applicant is an individual concerning whom no good cause exists to deny the license and who has obtained firearm liability insurance as provided under section 6109.1 12345678910111213141516171819 (relating to liability insurance). A license shall not be issued to any of the following:(i) An individual whose character and reputation is such that the individual would be likely to act in a manner dangerous to public safety.(ii) An individual who has been convicted of an offense under the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act.(iii) An individual convicted of a crime enumerated in section 6105.(iv) An individual who, within the past ten years, has been adjudicated delinquent for a crime enumerated in section 6105 or for an offense under The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act.(v) An individual who is not of sound mind or who has ever been committed to a mental institution.(vi) An individual who is addicted to or is an unlawful user of marijuana or a stimulant, depressant or narcotic drug.(vii) An individual who is a habitual drunkard.(viii) An individual who is charged with or has been convicted of a crime punishable by imprisonment for a term exceeding one year except as provided for in section 6123 (relating to waiver of disability or pardons).(ix) A resident of another state who does not possess a current license or permit or similar document to carry a firearm issued by that state if a license is provided for by the laws of that state, as published annually in the Federal Register by the Bureau of 20250SB0209PN0156 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Alcohol, Tobacco and Firearms of the Department of the Treasury under 18 U.S.C. § 921(a)(19) (relating to definitions).(x) An alien who is illegally in the United States.(xi) An individual who has been discharged from the armed forces of the United States under dishonorable conditions.(xii) An individual who is a fugitive from justice. This subparagraph does not apply to an individual whose fugitive status is based upon nonmoving or moving summary offense under Title 75 (relating to vehicles).(xiii) An individual who is otherwise prohibited from possessing, using, manufacturing, controlling, purchasing, selling or transferring a firearm as provided by section 6105.(xiv) An individual who is prohibited from possessing or acquiring a firearm under the statutes of the United States.(xv) An individual who has failed to obtain and provide to the issuing authority evidence of firearm liability insurance as provided under section 6109.1.* * *Section 2. Title 18 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6109.1. Liability insurance.(a) Requirement.--An individual may not possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer or be issued a license under section 6109 (relating to licenses) without first obtaining and providing a certificate of liability insurance verifying that the individual has a valid insurance policy insuring against injury to persons or property that may arise 20250SB0209PN0156 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 out of the use of a firearm covered by the license.(b) Required criteria.--The insurance policy shall meet all of the following criteria:(1) Be in an amount of at least $1,000,000.(2) Satisfy any judgment for personal injury or property damage arising out of a negligent or willful act involving the use of an insured firearm.(3) May not cover any unlawful act.(c) Notice of insurance.--An individual who has been issued a contract of firearm liability insurance, or any approved self-insurance entity, shall:(1) Notify the Pennsylvania State Police of the liability insurance on a form developed by the Pennsylvania State Police. The form shall include:(i) Name and address of the individual.(ii) Issuing insurance entity policy number and expiration date of policy.(iii) Names, addresses and age of additional individuals covered by the liability insurance policy entitled to possess, use or transport insured firearms.(2) Notify the licensing authority of the county in which the insured individual resides, if the firearm liability insurance becomes canceled or terminated. An insurer shall provide a copy of the notice of cancellation or a copy of the insurer's filing procedures with proof that the notice was written in the normal course of business and placed in the normal course of mailing.(3) Obtain from an insurance company an identification certificate to the insured which is valid only for the period for which coverage is paid by the insured. The insurance 20250SB0209PN0156 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 identification certificates shall disclose the period for which coverage is paid by the insured. If the insured has financed premiums through a premium finance company or is on an insurer-sponsored or agency-sponsored payment plan, the insurance identification certificate may be issued for a period of six months notwithstanding that the payment by the insured may be for a period of less than six months.(d) Duty to carry insurance identification certificate.--The insurer's insurance identification certificate shall be carried simultaneously with the insured firearm, as well as the license issued under section 6109, and shall be exhibited to a law enforcement officer upon demand for inspection. An owner who fails to produce the insurance identification certification on demand is subject to the following:(1) The law enforcement officer shall confiscate the firearm.(2) The owner of the firearm shall be provided with a signed and dated written receipt by the law enforcement officer. The receipt shall include a detailed identifying description indicating the serial number and condition of the firearm.(3) If, within 10 days, the law enforcement officer does not receive proof from the owner of the firearm that the owner has a valid firearm liability insurance policy, the law enforcement officer shall notify the licensing authority of the county in which the owner resides that proof of insurance was not provided and the firearm was confiscated.(4) Upon receipt of the notification, the licensing authority shall immediately revoke the owner's license to carry a firearm and immediately notify the owner and law 20250SB0209PN0156 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 enforcement officer of the license revocation.(5) A confiscated firearm shall be released to an owner by the law enforcement officer to whom the firearm was confiscated as follows:(i) after confirmation has been received by the law enforcement officer that the owner's license to carry has been revoked and the law enforcement officer has notified the owner that the license has been revoked and the owner may no longer carry the firearm in public; or(ii) the law enforcement officer has received proof from the owner of the firearm that the owner has a valid firearm liability insurance policy.(e) License reissuance fee.--(1) If a licensing authority revokes a person's license to carry a firearm, the licensing authority may not reissue the license to carry until the person furnishes proof of insurance.(2) The licensing authority shall charge a fee of $50 to reissue a license to carry following a revocation.(f) Foreign concealed weapons.--An individual who does not reside but is present in this Commonwealth with a concealed firearm and possesses a valid and lawfully issued license or permit to carry the firearm which has been issued under the laws of another state as provided under section 6106(b)(15) (relating to firearms not to be carried without a license) shall obtain firearm liability insurance as provided in this section within 30 days of arriving in this Commonwealth.(g) Penalties for noncompliance.--An individual who fails to maintain liability insurance as required under this subsection shall be subject to the following:20250SB0209PN0156 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) For a first offense, the individual shall be subject to a fine of at least $1,000.(2) For a second offense, the individual shall be subject to a fine of at least $5,000.(3) For a third offense, the individual commits a misdemeanor of the third degree and shall be subject to a fine of at least $10,000.(4) For a fourth and subsequent offense, the individual commits a misdemeanor of the second degree and shall be subject to a fine of at least $15,000.Section 3. Section 6111(b)(2) of Title 18 is amended to read:§ 6111. Sale or transfer of firearms.* * *(b) Duty of seller.--No licensed importer, licensed manufacturer or licensed dealer shall sell or deliver any firearm to another person, other than a licensed importer, licensed manufacturer, licensed dealer or licensed collector, until the conditions of subsection (a) have been satisfied and until he has:* * *(2) Inspected photoidentification and proof of liability insurance required under section 6109.1 (relating to liability insurance) of the potential purchaser or transferee, including, but not limited to, a driver's license, official Pennsylvania photoidentification card or official government photoidentification card. In the case of a potential buyer or transferee who is a member of a recognized religious sect or community whose tenets forbid or discourage the taking of photographs of members of that sect 20250SB0209PN0156 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or community, a seller shall accept a valid-without-photo driver's license or a combination of documents, as prescribed by the Pennsylvania State Police, containing the applicant's name, address, date of birth and the signature of the applicant.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250SB0209PN0156 - 8 - 1234567